Utah statutes.
59-7-614.4.   Tax credit for pass-through entity taxpayer.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Pass-through entity" is as defined in Section 59-10-1402.
(b)  "Pass-through entity taxpayer" is as defined in Section 59-10-1402.
(2)  A pass-through entity taxpayer may claim a refundable tax credit against
the tax otherwise due under this chapter.
(3)  The tax credit described in Subsection (2) is equal to the amount paid or
withheld by the pass-through entity on behalf of the pass-through entity
taxpayer described in Subsection (2) in accordance with Section 59-10-1403.2.
(4)  A pass-through entity taxpayer may not claim a tax credit under this
section for an amount for which the pass-through entity taxpayer claims a tax
credit under Section 59-10-1103.
